Illinois, session 104th, SB216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Sections 18-185, 18-205, and 18-212 and by adding Section 618-207 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 200/18-185)8    Sec. 18-185. Short title; definitions. This Division 5 9may be cited as the Property Tax Extension Limitation Law. As 10used in this Division 5: 11    "Consumer Price Index" means the Consumer Price Index for 12All Urban Consumers for all items published by the United 13States Department of Labor. 14    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable years prior to 152025: (a) the lesser of 5% or the percentage increase in the 16Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 17preceding the levy year; or (b) the rate of increase approved 18by voters under Section 18-205. 19    "Extension limitation" means, for taxable year 2025 and 20thereafter: (a) the lesser of 5% or the average percentage 21increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 10 years 22immediately preceding the levy year for which the extension 23limitation is being calculated; or (b) the rate of increase   SB0216- 2 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1approved by voters under Section 18-205. 2    "Affected county" means a county of 3,000,000 or more 3inhabitants or a county contiguous to a county of 3,000,000 or 4more inhabitants. 5    "Taxing district" has the same meaning provided in Section 61-150, except as otherwise provided in this Section. For the 71991 through 1994 levy years only, "taxing district" includes 8only each non-home rule taxing district having the majority of 9its 1990 equalized assessed value within any county or 10counties contiguous to a county with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants. Beginning with the 1995 levy year, "taxing 12district" includes only each non-home rule taxing district 13subject to this Law before the 1995 levy year and each non-home 14rule taxing district not subject to this Law before the 1995 15levy year having the majority of its 1994 equalized assessed 16value in an affected county or counties. Beginning with the 17levy year in which this Law becomes applicable to a taxing 18district as provided in Section 18-213, "taxing district" also 19includes those taxing districts made subject to this Law as 20provided in Section 18-213. 21    "Aggregate extension" for taxing districts to which this 22Law applied before the 1995 levy year means the annual 23corporate extension for the taxing district and those special 24purpose extensions that are made annually for the taxing 25district, excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for 26the taxing district to pay interest or principal on general   SB0216- 3 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1obligation bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made 2for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 3general obligation bonds issued before October 1, 1991; (c) 4made for any taxing district to pay interest or principal on 5bonds issued to refund or continue to refund those bonds 6issued before October 1, 1991; (d) made for any taxing 7district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued to 8refund or continue to refund bonds issued after October 1, 91991 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 10district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 11before October 1, 1991 for payment of which a property tax levy 12or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 13pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 14principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 15governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 16other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 17payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 18lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 19issued by the commission before October 1, 1991, to pay for the 20building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 21contracts entered into before October 1, 1991; (h) made for 22payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 23Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 24construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (i) 25made for payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, 26as defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform   SB0216- 4 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1Act, in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base 2less the amount in items (b), (c), (e), and (h) of this 3definition for non-referendum obligations, except obligations 4initially issued pursuant to referendum; (j) made for payments 5of principal and interest on bonds issued under Section 15 of 6the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made by a school 7district that participates in the Special Education District 8of Lake County, created by special education joint agreement 9under Section 10-22.31 of the School Code, for payment of the 10school district's share of the amounts required to be 11contributed by the Special Education District of Lake County 12to the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund under Article 7 of 13the Illinois Pension Code; the amount of any extension under 14this item (k) shall be certified by the school district to the 15county clerk; (l) made to fund expenses of providing joint 16recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 17Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 18the Illinois Municipal Code; (m) made for temporary relocation 19loan repayment purposes pursuant to Sections 2-3.77 and 2017-2.2d of the School Code; (n) made for payment of principal 21and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of 22Section 17-2.2d of the School Code; (o) made for contributions 23to a firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 24Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 25under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 26(p) made for road purposes in the first year after a township   SB0216- 5 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1assumes the rights, powers, duties, assets, property, 2liabilities, obligations, and responsibilities of a road 3district abolished under the provisions of Section 6-133 of 4the Illinois Highway Code; and (q) made under Section 4 of the 5Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or 6to supplement existing funds for community mental health 7facilities and services, including facilities and services for 8the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 9disorder; and (r) (q) made for the payment of principal and 10interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1117-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 12those bonds. 13    "Aggregate extension" for the taxing districts to which 14this Law did not apply before the 1995 levy year (except taxing 15districts subject to this Law in accordance with Section 1618-213) means the annual corporate extension for the taxing 17district and those special purpose extensions that are made 18annually for the taxing district, excluding special purpose 19extensions: (a) made for the taxing district to pay interest 20or principal on general obligation bonds that were approved by 21referendum; (b) made for any taxing district to pay interest 22or principal on general obligation bonds issued before March 231, 1995; (c) made for any taxing district to pay interest or 24principal on bonds issued to refund or continue to refund 25those bonds issued before March 1, 1995; (d) made for any 26taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued   SB0216- 6 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 1, 21995 that were approved by referendum; (e) made for any taxing 3district to pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued 4before March 1, 1995 for payment of which a property tax levy 5or the full faith and credit of the unit of local government is 6pledged; however, a tax for the payment of interest or 7principal on those bonds shall be made only after the 8governing body of the unit of local government finds that all 9other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 10payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 11lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 12issued by the commission before March 1, 1995 to pay for the 13building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 14contracts entered into before March 1, 1995; (h) made for 15payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under the 16Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act to finance 17construction projects initiated before October 1, 1991; (h-4) 18made for stormwater management purposes by the Metropolitan 19Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago under Section 12 20of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act; (h-8) made 21for payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 22Section 9.6a of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District 23Act to make contributions to the pension fund established 24under Article 13 of the Illinois Pension Code; (i) made for 25payments of principal and interest on limited bonds, as 26defined in Section 3 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act,   SB0216- 7 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1in an amount not to exceed the debt service extension base less 2the amount in items (b), (c), and (e) of this definition for 3non-referendum obligations, except obligations initially 4issued pursuant to referendum and bonds described in 5subsections (h) and (h-8) of this definition; (j) made for 6payments of principal and interest on bonds issued under 7Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform Act; (k) made 8for payments of principal and interest on bonds authorized by 9Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 10Park District Act for aquarium or museum projects and bonds 11issued under Section 20a of the Chicago Park District Act for 12the purpose of making contributions to the pension fund 13established under Article 12 of the Illinois Pension Code; (l) 14made for payments of principal and interest on bonds 15authorized by Public Act 87-1191 or 93-601 and (i) issued 16pursuant to Section 21.2 of the Cook County Forest Preserve 17District Act, (ii) issued under Section 42 of the Cook County 18Forest Preserve District Act for zoological park projects, or 19(iii) issued under Section 44.1 of the Cook County Forest 20Preserve District Act for botanical gardens projects; (m) made 21pursuant to Section 34-53.5 of the School Code, whether levied 22annually or not; (n) made to fund expenses of providing joint 23recreational programs for persons with disabilities under 24Section 5-8 of the Park District Code or Section 11-95-14 of 25the Illinois Municipal Code; (o) made by the Chicago Park 26District for recreational programs for persons with   SB0216- 8 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1disabilities under subsection (c) of Section 7.06 of the 2Chicago Park District Act; (p) made for contributions to a 3firefighter's pension fund created under Article 4 of the 4Illinois Pension Code, to the extent of the amount certified 5under item (5) of Section 4-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; 6(q) made by Ford Heights School District 169 under Section 717-9.02 of the School Code; (r) made for the purpose of making 8employer contributions to the Public School Teachers' Pension 9and Retirement Fund of Chicago under Section 34-53 of the 10School Code; and (s) made under Section 4 of the Community 11Mental Health Act to provide the necessary funds or to 12supplement existing funds for community mental health 13facilities and services, including facilities and services for 14the person with a developmental disability or a substance use 15disorder; and (t) (s) made for the payment of principal and 16interest on any bonds issued under the authority of Section 1717-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue to refund 18those bonds. 19    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 20this Law applies in accordance with Section 18-213, except for 21those taxing districts subject to paragraph (2) of subsection 22(e) of Section 18-213, means the annual corporate extension 23for the taxing district and those special purpose extensions 24that are made annually for the taxing district, excluding 25special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing district 26to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds that   SB0216- 9 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1were approved by referendum; (b) made for any taxing district 2to pay interest or principal on general obligation bonds 3issued before the date on which the referendum making this Law 4applicable to the taxing district is held; (c) made for any 5taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 6to refund or continue to refund those bonds issued before the 7date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 8taxing district is held; (d) made for any taxing district to 9pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 10continue to refund bonds issued after the date on which the 11referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district 12is held if the bonds were approved by referendum after the date 13on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 14taxing district is held; (e) made for any taxing district to 15pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before the 16date on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 17taxing district is held for payment of which a property tax 18levy or the full faith and credit of the unit of local 19government is pledged; however, a tax for the payment of 20interest or principal on those bonds shall be made only after 21the governing body of the unit of local government finds that 22all other sources for payment are insufficient to make those 23payments; (f) made for payments under a building commission 24lease when the lease payments are for the retirement of bonds 25issued by the commission before the date on which the 26referendum making this Law applicable to the taxing district   SB0216- 10 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1is held to pay for the building project; (g) made for payments 2due under installment contracts entered into before the date 3on which the referendum making this Law applicable to the 4taxing district is held; (h) made for payments of principal 5and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 6Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 7the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 8(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 9obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 10referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 11bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 12Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 13interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 14the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing 15airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 16installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 17before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 18a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 19fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 20persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 21District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 22Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 23fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 24the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 254-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; (m) made for the taxing 26district to pay interest or principal on general obligation   SB0216- 11 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1bonds issued pursuant to Section 19-3.10 of the School Code; 2and (n) made under Section 4 of the Community Mental Health Act 3to provide the necessary funds or to supplement existing funds 4for community mental health facilities and services, including 5facilities and services for the person with a developmental 6disability or a substance use disorder; and (o) (n) made for 7the payment of principal and interest on any bonds issued 8under the authority of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to 9refund or continue to refund those bonds. 10    "Aggregate extension" for all taxing districts to which 11this Law applies in accordance with paragraph (2) of 12subsection (e) of Section 18-213 means the annual corporate 13extension for the taxing district and those special purpose 14extensions that are made annually for the taxing district, 15excluding special purpose extensions: (a) made for the taxing 16district to pay interest or principal on general obligation 17bonds that were approved by referendum; (b) made for any 18taxing district to pay interest or principal on general 19obligation bonds issued before March 7, 1997 (the effective 20date of Public Act 89-718); (c) made for any taxing district to 21pay interest or principal on bonds issued to refund or 22continue to refund those bonds issued before March 7, 1997 23(the effective date of Public Act 89-718); (d) made for any 24taxing district to pay interest or principal on bonds issued 25to refund or continue to refund bonds issued after March 7, 261997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) if the bonds   SB0216- 12 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1were approved by referendum after March 7, 1997 (the effective 2date of Public Act 89-718); (e) made for any taxing district to 3pay interest or principal on revenue bonds issued before March 47, 1997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) for payment 5of which a property tax levy or the full faith and credit of 6the unit of local government is pledged; however, a tax for the 7payment of interest or principal on those bonds shall be made 8only after the governing body of the unit of local government 9finds that all other sources for payment are insufficient to 10make those payments; (f) made for payments under a building 11commission lease when the lease payments are for the 12retirement of bonds issued by the commission before March 7, 131997 (the effective date of Public Act 89-718) to pay for the 14building project; (g) made for payments due under installment 15contracts entered into before March 7, 1997 (the effective 16date of Public Act 89-718); (h) made for payments of principal 17and interest on limited bonds, as defined in Section 3 of the 18Local Government Debt Reform Act, in an amount not to exceed 19the debt service extension base less the amount in items (b), 20(c), and (e) of this definition for non-referendum 21obligations, except obligations initially issued pursuant to 22referendum; (i) made for payments of principal and interest on 23bonds issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt 24Reform Act; (j) made for a qualified airport authority to pay 25interest or principal on general obligation bonds issued for 26the purpose of paying obligations due under, or financing   SB0216- 13 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1airport facilities required to be acquired, constructed, 2installed or equipped pursuant to, contracts entered into 3before March 1, 1996 (but not including any amendments to such 4a contract taking effect on or after that date); (k) made to 5fund expenses of providing joint recreational programs for 6persons with disabilities under Section 5-8 of the Park 7District Code or Section 11-95-14 of the Illinois Municipal 8Code; (l) made for contributions to a firefighter's pension 9fund created under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, to 10the extent of the amount certified under item (5) of Section 114-134 of the Illinois Pension Code; and (m) made under Section 124 of the Community Mental Health Act to provide the necessary 13funds or to supplement existing funds for community mental 14health facilities and services, including facilities and 15services for the person with a developmental disability or a 16substance use disorder; and (n) (m) made for the payment of 17principal and interest on any bonds issued under the authority 18of Section 17-2.11 of the School Code or to refund or continue 19to refund those bonds. 20    "Debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 21that portion of the extension for a taxing district for the 221994 levy year, or for those taxing districts subject to this 23Law in accordance with Section 18-213, except for those 24subject to paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of Section 18-213, 25for the levy year in which the referendum making this Law 26applicable to the taxing district is held, or for those taxing   SB0216- 14 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1districts subject to this Law in accordance with paragraph (2) 2of subsection (e) of Section 18-213 for the 1996 levy year, 3constituting an extension for payment of principal and 4interest on bonds issued by the taxing district without 5referendum, but not including excluded non-referendum bonds. 6For park districts (i) that were first subject to this Law in 71991 or 1995 and (ii) whose extension for the 1994 levy year 8for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued by 9the park district without referendum (but not including 10excluded non-referendum bonds) was less than 51% of the amount 11for the 1991 levy year constituting an extension for payment 12of principal and interest on bonds issued by the park district 13without referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum 14bonds), "debt service extension base" means an amount equal to 15that portion of the extension for the 1991 levy year 16constituting an extension for payment of principal and 17interest on bonds issued by the park district without 18referendum (but not including excluded non-referendum bonds). 19A debt service extension base established or increased at any 20time pursuant to any provision of this Law, except Section 2118-212, shall be increased each year commencing with the later 22of (i) the 2009 levy year or (ii) the first levy year in which 23this Law becomes applicable to the taxing district, by the 24extension limitation lesser of 5% or the percentage increase 25in the Consumer Price Index during the 12-month calendar year 26preceding the levy year. The debt service extension base may   SB0216- 15 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1be established or increased as provided under Section 18-212. 2"Excluded non-referendum bonds" means (i) bonds authorized by 3Public Act 88-503 and issued under Section 20a of the Chicago 4Park District Act for aquarium and museum projects; (ii) bonds 5issued under Section 15 of the Local Government Debt Reform 6Act; or (iii) refunding obligations issued to refund or to 7continue to refund obligations initially issued pursuant to 8referendum. 9    "Special purpose extensions" include, but are not limited 10to, extensions for levies made on an annual basis for 11unemployment and workers' compensation, self-insurance, 12contributions to pension plans, and extensions made pursuant 13to Section 6-601 of the Illinois Highway Code for a road 14district's permanent road fund whether levied annually or not. 15The extension for a special service area is not included in the 16aggregate extension. 17    "Aggregate extension base" means the taxing district's 18last preceding aggregate extension as adjusted under Sections 1918-135, 18-215, 18-230, 18-206, and 18-233. Beginning with 20levy year 2022, for taxing districts that are specified in 21Section 18-190.7, the taxing district's aggregate extension 22base shall be calculated as provided in Section 18-190.7. An 23adjustment under Section 18-135 shall be made for the 2007 24levy year and all subsequent levy years whenever one or more 25counties within which a taxing district is located (i) used 26estimated valuations or rates when extending taxes in the   SB0216- 16 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1taxing district for the last preceding levy year that resulted 2in the over or under extension of taxes, or (ii) increased or 3decreased the tax extension for the last preceding levy year 4as required by Section 18-135(c). Whenever an adjustment is 5required under Section 18-135, the aggregate extension base of 6the taxing district shall be equal to the amount that the 7aggregate extension of the taxing district would have been for 8the last preceding levy year if either or both (i) actual, 9rather than estimated, valuations or rates had been used to 10calculate the extension of taxes for the last levy year, or 11(ii) the tax extension for the last preceding levy year had not 12been adjusted as required by subsection (c) of Section 18-135.13    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 142012, the aggregate extension base for West Northfield School 15District No. 31 in Cook County shall be $12,654,592. 16    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the 17purpose of calculating the limiting rate for levy year 2023, 18the last preceding aggregate extension base for Homewood 19School District No. 153 in Cook County shall be $19,535,377. 20    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for levy year 212022, the aggregate extension base of a home equity assurance 22program that levied at least $1,000,000 in property taxes in 23levy year 2019 or 2020 under the Home Equity Assurance Act 24shall be the amount that the program's aggregate extension 25base for levy year 2021 would have been if the program had 26levied a property tax for levy year 2021.   SB0216- 17 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1    "Levy year" has the same meaning as "year" under Section 21-155. 3    "New property" means (i) the assessed value, after final 4board of review or board of appeals action, of new 5improvements or additions to existing improvements on any 6parcel of real property that increase the assessed value of 7that real property during the levy year multiplied by the 8equalization factor issued by the Department under Section 917-30, (ii) the assessed value, after final board of review or 10board of appeals action, of real property not exempt from real 11estate taxation, which real property was exempt from real 12estate taxation for any portion of the immediately preceding 13levy year, multiplied by the equalization factor issued by the 14Department under Section 17-30, including the assessed value, 15upon final stabilization of occupancy after new construction 16is complete, of any real property located within the 17boundaries of an otherwise or previously exempt military 18reservation that is intended for residential use and owned by 19or leased to a private corporation or other entity, (iii) in 20counties that classify in accordance with Section 4 of Article 21IX of the Illinois Constitution, an incentive property's 22additional assessed value resulting from a scheduled increase 23in the level of assessment as applied to the first year final 24board of review market value, and (iv) any increase in 25assessed value due to oil or gas production from an oil or gas 26well required to be permitted under the Hydraulic Fracturing   SB0216- 18 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1Regulatory Act that was not produced in or accounted for 2during the previous levy year. In addition, the county clerk 3in a county containing a population of 3,000,000 or more shall 4include in the 1997 recovered tax increment value for any 5school district, any recovered tax increment value that was 6applicable to the 1995 tax year calculations. 7    "Qualified airport authority" means an airport authority 8organized under the Airport Authorities Act and located in a 9county bordering on the State of Wisconsin and having a 10population in excess of 200,000 and not greater than 500,000. 11    "Recovered tax increment value" means, except as otherwise 12provided in this paragraph, the amount of the current year's 13equalized assessed value, in the first year after a 14municipality terminates the designation of an area as a 15redevelopment project area previously established under the 16Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois 17Municipal Code, previously established under the Industrial 18Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously 19established under the Economic Development Project Area Tax 20Increment Act of 1995, or previously established under the 21Economic Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, of 22each taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in 23the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 24equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 25project area. For the taxes which are extended for the 1997 26levy year, the recovered tax increment value for a non-home   SB0216- 19 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1rule taxing district that first became subject to this Law for 2the 1995 levy year because a majority of its 1994 equalized 3assessed value was in an affected county or counties shall be 4increased if a municipality terminated the designation of an 5area in 1993 as a redevelopment project area previously 6established under the Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment 7Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, previously established 8under the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois 9Municipal Code, or previously established under the Economic 10Development Area Tax Increment Allocation Act, by an amount 11equal to the 1994 equalized assessed value of each taxable 12lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property in the 13redevelopment project area over and above the initial 14equalized assessed value of each property in the redevelopment 15project area. In the first year after a municipality removes a 16taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property from a 17redevelopment project area established under the Tax Increment 18Allocation Redevelopment Act in the Illinois Municipal Code, 19the Industrial Jobs Recovery Law in the Illinois Municipal 20Code, or the Economic Development Area Tax Increment 21Allocation Act, "recovered tax increment value" means the 22amount of the current year's equalized assessed value of each 23taxable lot, block, tract, or parcel of real property removed 24from the redevelopment project area over and above the initial 25equalized assessed value of that real property before removal 26from the redevelopment project area.   SB0216- 20 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, "limiting 2rate" means a fraction the numerator of which is the last 3preceding aggregate extension base (as reduced by Section 418-207, if applicable) times an amount equal to one plus the 5extension limitation defined in this Section and the 6denominator of which is the current year's equalized assessed 7value of all real property in the territory under the 8jurisdiction of the taxing district during the prior levy 9year. For those taxing districts that reduced their aggregate 10extension for the last preceding levy year, except for school 11districts that reduced their extension for educational 12purposes pursuant to Section 18-206 and taxing districts that 13reduced their aggregate extension pursuant to Section 18-207, 14the highest aggregate extension in any of the last 3 preceding 15levy years shall be used for the purpose of computing the 16limiting rate. The denominator shall not include new property 17or the recovered tax increment value. If a new rate, a rate 18decrease, or a limiting rate increase has been approved at an 19election held after March 21, 2006, then (i) the otherwise 20applicable limiting rate shall be increased by the amount of 21the new rate or shall be reduced by the amount of the rate 22decrease, as the case may be, or (ii) in the case of a limiting 23rate increase, the limiting rate shall be equal to the rate set 24forth in the proposition approved by the voters for each of the 25years specified in the proposition, after which the limiting 26rate of the taxing district shall be calculated as otherwise   SB0216- 21 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1provided. In the case of a taxing district that obtained 2referendum approval for an increased limiting rate on March 320, 2012, the limiting rate for tax year 2012 shall be the rate 4that generates the approximate total amount of taxes 5extendable for that tax year, as set forth in the proposition 6approved by the voters; this rate shall be the final rate 7applied by the county clerk for the aggregate of all capped 8funds of the district for tax year 2012.9(Source: P.A. 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-311, eff. 8-6-21; 10102-519, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-707, eff. 114-22-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 12103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-587, eff. 5-28-24; 103-591, eff. 137-1-24; 103-592, eff. 6-7-24; revised 7-9-24.) 14    (35 ILCS 200/18-205)15    Sec. 18-205. Referendum to increase the extension 16limitation. A taxing district is limited to an extension 17limitation as defined in Section 18-185 of 5% or the 18percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 1912-month calendar year preceding the levy year, whichever is 20less. A taxing district may increase its extension limitation 21for one or more levy years if that taxing district holds a 22referendum before the levy date for the first levy year at 23which a majority of voters voting on the issue approves 24adoption of a higher extension limitation. Referenda shall be 25conducted at a regularly scheduled election in accordance with   SB0216- 22 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1the Election Code. The question shall be presented in 2substantially the following manner for all elections held 3after March 21, 2006:4        Shall the extension limitation under the Property Tax 5    Extension Limitation Law for (insert the legal name, 6    number, if any, and county or counties of the taxing 7    district and geographic or other common name by which a 8    school or community college district is known and referred 9    to), Illinois, be increased from (the extension limitation 10    under item (a) of the definition of extension limitation 11    in Section 18-185) the lesser of 5% or the percentage 12    increase in the Consumer Price Index over the prior levy 13    year to (insert the percentage of the proposed increase)% 14    per year for (insert each levy year for which the 15    increased extension limitation will apply)?16The votes must be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 17If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 18adoption of the increase, the increase shall be applicable for 19each levy year specified.20    The ballot for any question submitted pursuant to this 21Section shall have printed thereon, but not as a part of the 22question submitted, only the following supplemental 23information (which shall be supplied to the election authority 24by the taxing district) in substantially the following form:25        (1) For the (insert the first levy year for which the 26    increased extension limitation will be applicable) levy   SB0216- 23 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1    year the approximate amount of the additional tax 2    extendable against property containing a single family 3    residence and having a fair market value at the time of the 4    referendum of $100,000 is estimated to be $....5        (2) Based upon an average annual percentage increase 6    (or decrease) in the market value of such property of ...% 7    (insert percentage equal to the average annual percentage 8    increase or decrease for the prior 3 levy years, at the 9    time the submission of the question is initiated by the 10    taxing district, in the amount of (A) the equalized 11    assessed value of the taxable property in the taxing 12    district less (B) the new property included in the 13    equalized assessed value), the approximate amount of the 14    additional tax extendable against such property for the 15    ... levy year is estimated to be $... and for the ... levy 16    year is estimated to be $....17    Paragraph (2) shall be included only if the increased 18extension limitation will be applicable for more than one year 19and shall list each levy year for which the increased 20extension limitation will be applicable. The additional tax 21shown for each levy year shall be the approximate dollar 22amount of the increase over the amount of the most recently 23completed extension at the time the submission of the question 24is initiated by the taxing district. The approximate amount of 25the additional tax extendable shown in paragraphs (1) and (2) 26shall be calculated by multiplying $100,000 (the fair market   SB0216- 24 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1value of the property without regard to any property tax 2exemptions) by (i) the percentage level of assessment 3prescribed for that property by statute, or by ordinance of 4the county board in counties that classify property for 5purposes of taxation in accordance with Section 4 of Article 6IX of the Illinois Constitution; (ii) the most recent final 7equalization factor certified to the county clerk by the 8Department of Revenue at the time the taxing district 9initiates the submission of the proposition to the electors; 10(iii) the last known aggregate extension base of the taxing 11district at the time the submission of the question is 12initiated by the taxing district; and (iv) the difference 13between the percentage increase proposed in the question and 14the otherwise applicable extension limitation lesser of 5% or 15the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for the 16prior levy year (or an estimate of the percentage increase for 17the prior levy year if the increase is unavailable at the time 18the submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 19district); and dividing the result by the last known equalized 20assessed value of the taxing district at the time the 21submission of the question is initiated by the taxing 22district. This amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly is 23intended to clarify the existing requirements of this Section, 24and shall not be construed to validate any prior non-compliant 25referendum language. Any notice required to be published in 26connection with the submission of the question shall also   SB0216- 25 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1contain this supplemental information and shall not contain 2any other supplemental information. Any error, miscalculation, 3or inaccuracy in computing any amount set forth on the ballot 4or in the notice that is not deliberate shall not invalidate or 5affect the validity of any proposition approved. Notice of the 6referendum shall be published and posted as otherwise required 7by law, and the submission of the question shall be initiated 8as provided by law. 9(Source: P.A. 97-1087, eff. 8-24-12.) 10    (35 ILCS 200/18-207 new)11    Sec. 18-207. Reduced aggregate extension base.12    (a) Upon submission of a petition signed by a number of 13voters of the taxing district that is not less than 10% of the 14votes cast in the taxing district at the immediately preceding 15gubernatorial election, the question of whether a taxing 16district shall reduce its aggregate extension base for the 17purpose of lowering its limiting rate for future years shall 18be submitted to the voters of the taxing district at the next 19general or consolidated election. The petition shall set forth 20the amount of the reduction and the levy years for which the 21reduction shall be applicable. 22    (b) The petition shall be filed with the applicable 23election authority, as defined in Section 1-3 of the Election 24Code, or, in the case of multiple election authorities, with 25the State Board of Elections, not more than 10 months nor less   SB0216- 26 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1than 6 months prior to the election at which the question is to 2be submitted to the voters, and its validity shall be 3determined as provided by Article 28 of the Election Code and 4general election law. The election authority or Board, as 5applicable, shall certify the question and the proper election 6authority or authorities shall submit the question to the 7voters. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, this 8referendum shall be subject to all other general election law 9requirements. 10    (c) The proposition seeking to reduce the aggregate 11extension base shall be in substantially the following form: 12        Shall the aggregate extension base used to calculate 13    the limiting rate for (taxing district) under the Property 14    Tax Extension Limitation Law be reduced by (amount of 15    money expressed in U.S. dollars) for (levy year or years)? 16    Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No". 17    If a majority of all votes cast on the proposition are in 18favor of the proposition, then the aggregate extension base 19shall be reduced as provided in the referendum.  20    (35 ILCS 200/18-212)21    Sec. 18-212. Referendum on debt service extension base. A 22taxing district may establish or increase its debt service 23extension base if (i) that taxing district holds a referendum 24before the date on which the levy must be filed with the county 25clerk of the county or counties in which the taxing district is   SB0216- 27 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1situated and (ii) a majority of voters voting on the issue 2approves the establishment of or increase in the debt service 3extension base. A debt service extension base established or 4increased by a referendum held pursuant to this Section after 5February 2, 2010, shall be increased each year, commencing 6with the first levy year beginning after the date of the 7referendum, by the extension limitation lesser of 5% or the 8percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the 912-month calendar year preceding the levy year if the optional 10language concerning the annual increase is included in the 11question submitted to the electors of the taxing district. 12Referenda under this Section shall be conducted at a regularly 13scheduled election in accordance with the Election Code. The 14governing body of the taxing district shall certify the 15question to the proper election authorities who shall submit 16the question to the electors of the taxing district in 17substantially the following form:18        "Shall the debt service extension base under the 19    Property Tax Extension Limitation Law for ... (taxing 20    district name) ... for payment of principal and interest 21    on limited bonds be .... ((established at $ ....) . (or) 22    (increased from $ .... to $ ....)) .. for the ..... levy 23    year and all subsequent levy years (optional language: , 24    such debt service extension base to be increased each year 25    by (extension limitation amount) the lesser of 5% or the 26    percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index during the   SB0216- 28 -LRB104 03819 HLH 13843 b1    12-month calendar year preceding the levy year)?"2    Votes on the question shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".3    If a majority of voters voting on the issue approves the 4establishment of or increase in the debt service extension 5base, the establishment of or increase in the debt service 6extension base shall be applicable for the levy years 7specified.8(Source: P.A. 96-1202, eff. 7-22-10.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.